South Dakota, session 2026, HB1099.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 34-20B-14 be AMENDED:
34-20B-14. Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation that contains any
quantity of the following hallucinogenic substances, their salts, isomers, and salts of
isomers, is included in Schedule I, unless specifically excepted, whenever the existence of
the salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation:
(1) Bufotenine;
(2) Diethyltryptamine (DET);
(3) Dimethyltryptamine (DMT);
(4) 5-methoxy-N, N-Dimethyltryptamine (5-MeO-DMT);
(5) 5-methoxy-3, 4-methylenedioxy amphetamine;
(6) 4-bromo-2, 5-dimethoxyamphetamine;
(7) 4-methoxyamphetamine;
(8) 4-methoxymethamphetamine;
(9) 4-methyl-2, 5-dimethoxyamphetamine;
(10) Hashish and hash oil;
(11) Ibogaine;
(12) Lysergic acid diethylamide;
(13) Mescaline;
(14) N-ethyl-3-piperidyl benzilate;
(15) N-methyl-3-piperidyl benzilate;
(16) 1-(-(2-thienyl)cyclohexyl) piperidine (TCP);

26.293.20 2 1099
(17) Peyote, except when used as a sacramental in services of the Native American
church, in a natural state that is unaltered, except for drying or curing and cutting
or slicing;
(18) Psilocybin, except the pharmaceutical composition of crystalline polymorph
psilocybin in a drug product approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration;
(19) Psilocyn;
(20) Tetrahydrocannabinol, except that which occurs in industrial hemp as defined in
§ 38-35-1; in a drug product approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration; or marijuana in its natural and unaltered state; including any
compound, except nabilone or compounds listed under a different schedule,
structurally derived from 6,6Ν dimethyl-benzo[c]chromene by substitution at the
3-position with either alkyl (C3 to C8), methyl cycloalkyl, or adamantyl groups,
whether or not the compound is further modified in any of the following ways:
(a) By partial to complete saturation of the C-ring; or
(b) By substitution at the 1-position with a hydroxyl or methoxy group; or
(c) By substitution at the 9-position with a hydroxyl, methyl, or methylhydoxyl
group; or
(d) By modification of the possible 3-alkyl group with a 1,1Ν dimethyl moiety, a
1,1Ν cyclic moiety, an internal methylene group, an internal acetylene
group, or a terminal halide, cyano, azido, or dimethylcarboxamido group.
Some trade and other names: JWH-051; JWH-057; JWH-133; JWH-359; HHC; AM-
087; AM-411; AM-855, AM-905; AM-906; AM-2389; HU-210; HU-211; HU-243;
HU-336;
(21) 3, 4, 5-trimethoxy amphetamine;
(22) 3, 4-methylenedioxy amphetamine;
(23) 3-methoxyamphetamine;
(24) 2, 5-dimethoxyamphetamine;
(25) 2-methoxyamphetamine;
(26) 2-methoxymethamphetamine;
(27) 3-methoxymethamphetamine;
(28) Phencyclidine;
(29) 3, 4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine (MDMA);
(30) 3, 4-methylenedioxy-N-ethylamphetamine;
(31) N-hydroxy-3, 4-methylenedioxyamphetamine;
HB1099 ENROLLED

26.293.20 3 1099
(32) 4-methylaminorex (also known as 2-Amino-4-methyl/x-5-phenyl-2-oxazoline);
(33) 2,5 Dimethoxy-4-ethylamphetamine;
(34) N,N-Dimethylamphetamine;
(35) 1-(1-(2-thienyl)cyclohexyl)pyrrolidine;
(36) Aminorex;
(37) 4,4′-Dimethylaminorex (4,4′-DMAR; 4,5-dihydro-4-methyl-5-(4-methylphenyl)-2-
oxazolamine; 4-methyl-5-(4-methylphenyl)-4,5-dihydro-1,3-oxazol-2-amine);
(38) Cathinone and other variations, defined as any compound, material, mixture,
preparation or other product unless listed in another schedule or an approved FDA
drug, structurally derived from 2-aminopropan-1-one by substitution at the 1-
position with either phenyl, naphthyl, or thiophene ring systems, whether or not
the compound is further modified in any of the following ways:
(a) By substitution in the ring system to any extent with alkyl, alkylenedioxy,
alkoxy, haloalkyl, hydroxyl, or halide substituents, whether or not further
substituted in the ring system by one or more other univalent substitutents;
(b) By substitution at the 3-position with an acyclic alkyl substituent; or
(c) By substitution at the 2-amino nitrogen atom with alkyl, dialkyl, benzyl, or
methoxybenzyl groups or by inclusion of the 2-amino nitrogen atom in a
cyclic structure.
Some trade or other names: methcathinone, 4-methyl-N-methylcathinone
(mephedrone); 3,4-methylenedioxy-N-methylcathinone (methylone); 3,4-
methylenedioxypyrovalerone (MDPV); Naphthylpyrovalerone (naphyrone); 4-
flouromethcathinone (flephedrone); 4-methoxymethcathinone (methedrone; Bk-
PMMA); Ethcathinone (N-Ethylcathinone); 3,4-methylenedioxyethcathinone
(ethylone); Beta-keto-N-methyl-3,4-benzodioxyolybutanamine (butylone); N,N-
dimethylcathinone (metamfepramone); Alpha-pyrrolidinopropiophenone (alpha-
PPP); 4-methoxy-alpha-pyrrolidinopropiophenone (MOPPP); 3,4-
methylenedioxyalphapyrrolidinopropiophenone (MDPPP); Alpha-
pyrrolidinovalerophenone (alpha-PVP); 3-fluoromethcathinone; 4Ν-Methyl-alpha-
pyrrolidinobutiophenone (MPBP); Methyl-α-pyrrolindinopropiophenone (MPPP);
Methyl-α-pyrrolidino-hexanophenone (MPHP); Buphedrone; Methyl-N-
ethylcathinone; Pentedrone; Dimethylmethcathinone (DMMC);
Dimethylethcathinone (DMEC); Methylenedioxymethcathinone (MDMC);
Pentylone; Ethylethcathinone; Ethylmethcathinone; Fluoroethcathinone; methyl-
alpha-pyrrolidinobutiophenone (MPBP); Methylecathinone (MEC); Methylenedioxy-
HB1099 ENROLLED

26.293.20 4 1099
alpha-pyrrolidinobutiophenone (MDPBP); Methoxymethcathinone (MOMC);
Methylbuphedrone (MBP); Benzedrone (4-MBC); Dibutylone (DMBDB);
Dimethylone (MDDMA); Diethylcathinone; Eutylone (EBDB); N-ethyl-N-
Methylcathinone; N-ethylbuphedrone, 1-(1,3-benzodioxol-5-yl)2-
(ethylamino)pentan-1-one (N-Ethylpentylone); 4'-Methyl-alpha-
pyrrolidinopropiophenone (4-MEPPP, MPPP or MαPPP); alpha-
Pyrrolidinobutiophenone (α-PBP); 1-(1,3-benzodioxol-5-yl)-2-(tert-
butylamino)propan-1-one (Tertylone); 1-(1,3-benzodioxol-5-yl)-2-
(ethylamino)hexan-1-one (N-ethyl Hexylone); 1-(1,3-benzodioxol-5-yl)-2-
(methylamino)pntan-1-one (Pentylone); N-ethylhexedrone (α
ethylaminohexanophenone); alpha-pyrrolidinohexanophenone (α-PHP); 4-methyl-
alpha-ethylaminopentiophenone (4-MEAP); 4′-methyl-alpha-
pyrrolidinohexiophenone (MPHP); alpha-pyrrolidinoheptaphenone (PV8); 4′-
chloro-alpha-pyrrolidinovalerophenone (4-chloro-α-PVP); Alpha-PIHP (4-methyl-
1-phenyl-2-(pyrrolindin-1-yl)pentan-1-one;
(39) 2,5-Dimethoxy-4-ethylamphetamine (DOET);
(40) Alpha-ethyltryptamine;
(41) 4-Bromo-2,5-dimethoxy phenethylamine;
(42) 2,5-dimethoxy-4-(n)-propylthiophenethylamine (2C-T-7);
(43) 1-(3-trifluoromethylphenyl) piperazine (TFMPP);
(44) Alpha-methyltryptamine (AMT);
(45) 5-methoxy-N,N-diisopropyltryptamine (5-MeO-DIPT);
(46) 5-methoxy-N,N-dimethyltryptamine (5-MeO-DMT);
(47) Synthetic cannabinoids. Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation that is
not listed as a controlled substance in another schedule, is not an FDA-approved
drug, and contains any quantity of the following substances, their salts, isomers
(whether optical, positional, or geometric), homologues, modifications of the indole
ring by nitrogen heterocyclic analog substitution or nitrogen heterocyclic analog
substitution of the phenyl, benzyl, naphthyl, adamantly, cyclopropyl, cumyl, or
propionaldehyde structure, and salts of isomers, homologues, and modifications,
unless specifically excepted, whenever the existence of these salts, isomers,
homologues, modifications, and salts of isomers, homologues, and modifications is
possible within the specific chemical designation:
(a) Naphthoylindoles. Any compound containing a 2-(1- naphthoyl)indole or 3-
(1-naphthoyl)indole structure with substitution at the nitrogen atom of the
HB1099 ENROLLED

26.293.20 5 1099
indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl,
1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinhyl)methyl, 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, cyanoalky, 1-
(N-methyl-2-pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3-morpholinyl)methyl,
(tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl, benzyl, or halobenzyl group, whether or not
further substituted on the indole ring to any extent and whether or not
substituted on the naphthyl ring to any extent.
Some trade or other names: JWH-015; 1-pentyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole
(JWH-018); 1-hexyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole (JWH-019); 1-butyl-3-(1-
naphthoyl)indole (JWH-073); 1-pentyl-3-[1-(4-methoxynaphthoyl)]indole
(JWH-081); 1-pentyl-3-(4-methyl-1-naphthoyl)indole (JWH-122); 1-[2-(4-
morpholinyl)ethyl]-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole (JWH-200); JWH-210; JWH-398;
1-pentyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole (AM-678); 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-3-(1-
naphthoyl)indole (AM-2201); WIN 55-212; JWH-004; JWH-007; JWH-009;
JWH-011; JWH-016; JWH-020; JWH-022; JWH-046; JWH-047; JWH-048;
JWH-049; JWH-050; JWH-070; JWH-071; JWH-072; JWH-076; JWH-079;
JWH-080; JWH-082; JWH-094; JWH-096; JWH-098; JWH-116; JWH-120;
JWH-148; JWH-149; JWH-164; JWH-166; JWH-180; JWH-181; JWH-182;
JWH-189; JWH-193; JWH-198; JWH-211; JWH-212; JWH-213; JWH-234;
JWH-235; JWH-236; JWH-239; JWH-240; JWH-241; JWH-258; JWH-262;
JWH-386; JWH-387; JWH-394; JWH-395; JWH-397; JWH-399; JWH-400;
JWH-412; JWH-413; JWH-414; JWH-415; JWH-424; AM-678; AM-1220;
AM-1221; AM-1235; AM-2232, THJ-2201;
(b) Naphthylmethylindoles. Any compound containing a 1H-indol-2-yl-(1-
naphthyl)methane or 1H-indol-3-yl-(1-naphthyl)methane structure with
substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl,
alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-
piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, cyanoalky, 1-(N-methyl-2-
pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3-morpholinyl)methyl, (tetrahydropyran-
4-yl)methyl, benzyl, or halobenzyl group, whether or not further substituted
on the indole ring to any extent and whether or not substituted on the
naphthyl ring to any extent.
Some trade or other names: JWH-175; JWH-184; JWH-185; JWH-192;
JWH-194; JWH-195; JWH-196; JWH-197; JWH-199;
(c) Phenylacetylindoles. Any compound containing a 2-phenylacetylindole or 3-
phenylacetylindole structure with substitution at the nitrogen atom of the
HB1099 ENROLLED

26.293.20 6 1099
indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl,
1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, cyanoalky, 1-
(N-methyl-2-pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3-morpholinyl)methyl,
(tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl, benzyl, or halobenzyl group, whether or not
further substituted on the indole ring to any extent and whether or not
substituted on the phenyl ring to any extent.
Some trade or other names: 1-cyc lohexylethyl-3-(2-
methoxyphenylacetyl)indole (SR-18); 1-cyclohexylethyl-3-(2-
methoxyphenylacetyl)indole (RCS-8); 1-pentyl-3-(2-
methoxyphenylacetyl)indole (JWH-250); 1-pentyl-3-(2-
chlorophenylacetyl)indole (JWH-203); JWH-167; JWH-201; JWH-202; JWH-
204; JWH-205; JWH-206; JWH-207; JWH-208; JWH-209; JWH-237; JWH-
248; JWH-249; JWH-251; JWH-253; JWH-302; JWH-303; JWH-304; JWH-
305; JWH-306; JWH-311; JWH-312; JWH-313; JWH-314; JWH-315; JWH-
316; Cannabipiperidiethanone;
(d) Benzoylindoles. Any compound containing a 2-(benzoyl)indole or 3-
(benzoyl)indole structure with substitution at the nitrogen atom of the
indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl,
1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, cyanoalky, 1-
(N-methyl-2-pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3-morpholinyl)methyl,
(tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl, benzyl, or halobenzyl group, whether or not
further substituted on the indole ring to any extent and whether or not
substituted on the phenyl ring to any extent.
Some trade or other names: 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-3-(2-iodobenzoyl)indole
(AM-694); 1-pentyl-3-[(4-methoxy)-benzoyl]indole (SR-19); Pravadoline
(WIN 48,098); 1-pentyl-3-[(4-methoxy)-benzoyl]indole (RCS-4); AM-630;
AM-661; AM-2233; AM-1241;
(e) Naphthoylpyrroles. Any compound containing a 2-(1-naphthoyl)pyrrole or 3-
(1-naphthoyl)pyrrole structure with substitution at the nitrogen atom of the
pyrrole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl,
cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl,
cyanoalky, 1-(N-methyl-2-pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3-
morpholinyl)methyl, (tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl, benzyl, or halobenzyl
group, whether or not further substituted on the pyrrole ring to any extent
and whether or not substituted on the naphthyl ring to any extent.
HB1099 ENROLLED

26.293.20 7 1099
Some trade or other names: JWH-307; JWH-030; JWH-031; JWH-145;
JWH-146; JWH-147; JWH-150; JWH-156; JWH-242; JWH-243; JWH-244;
JWH-245; JWH-246; JWH-292; JWH-293; JWH-308; JWH-309; JWH-346;
JWH-348; JWH-363; JWH-364; JWH-365; JWH-367; JWH-368; JWH-369;
JWH-370; JWH-371; JWH-373; JWH-392;
(f) Naphthylmethylindenes. Any compound containing a naphthylideneindene
structure with substitution at the 3-position of the indene ring by an alkyl,
haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-
piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, cyanoalky, 1-(N-methyl-2-
pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3-morpholinyl)methyl, (tetrahydropyran-
4-yl)methyl, benzyl, or halobenzyl group, whether or not further substituted
on the indene ring to any extent and whether or not substituted on the
naphthyl ring to any extent.
Some trade or other names: JWH-171; JWH-176; JWH-220;
(g) Cyclohexylphenols. Any compound containing a 2-(3-
hydroxycyclohexyl)phenol structure with substitution at the 5-position of
the phenolic ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl,
cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 2-(4-
morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3-
morpholinyl)methyl, (tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl, benzyl, or halobenzyl
group, whether or not substituted on the cyclohexyl ring to any extent.
Some trade or other names: 5-(1,1-dimethylheptyl)-2-[(1R,3S)-3-
hydroxycyclohexyl]-phenol (CP 47, 497 and homologues, which includes
C8); cannabicyclohexanol; CP-55,490; CP-55,940; CP-56,667;
(h) (6aR,10aR)-9-(hydroxymethyl)-6,6-dimethyl-3-(2-methyloctan-2-yl)
6a,7,10,10a-tetrahydrobenzo[c]chromen-1-ol. Some trade or other names:
HU-210;
(i) 2,3-Dihydro-5-methyl-3-(4-m orpholinylmethyl)pyrrolo[1,2,3-de]-1,4-
benzoxazin-6-yl]-1-napthalenyl. Some trade or other names: WIN 55, 212-
2;
(j) Substituted Acetylindoles. Any compound containing a 2-acetyl indole or 3-
acetyl indole structure substituted at the acetyl by replacement of the
methyl group with a tetramethylcyclopropyl, adamantyl, benzyl, cumyl, or
propionaldehyde substituent whether or not further substituted on the
tetramethylcyclopropyl, adamantyl, benzyl, cumyl, or propionaldehyde
HB1099 ENROLLED

26.293.20 8 1099
substituent to any extent and whether or not further substituted at the
nitrogen atom of the indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, cyanoalkyl, alkenyl,
cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-
morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3-
morpholinyl)methyl, (tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl, benzyl, or halobenzyl
group whether or not further substituted on the indole ring to any extent.
Some trade and or names: (1-Pentylindol-3-yl)-(2,2,3,3-
tetramethylcyclopropyl)methanone (UR-144); (1-(5-fluoropentyl)indol-3-
yl)-(2,2,3,3-tetramethylcyclopropyl)methanone (XLR-11); (1-(2-
morpholin-4-ylethyl)-1H-indol-3-yl)-(2,2,3,3-
tetramethylcyclopropyl)methanone (A-796,260); 1-[(N-methylpiperidin-2-
yl)methyl]-3-(adamant-1-oyl)indole (AM-1248); 1-Pentyl-3-(1-
adamantoyl)indole (AB-001 and JWH-018 adamantyl analog); AM-679; (1-
(4-fluorobenzyl)-1H-indol-3-yl)(2,2,3,3-
tetramethylcyclopropyl)methanone (FUB-144);
(k) Substituted Carboxamide Indole. Any compound containing a 2-carboxamide
indole or 3-carboxamide indole structure substituted at the nitrogen of the
carboxamide with a tetramethylcyclopropyl, naphthyl, adamantyl, cumyl,
phenyl, or propionaldehyde substituent, whether or not further substituted
on the tetramethylcyclopropyl, adamantyl, cumyl, naphthyl, phenyl, or
propionaldehyde substituent to any extent and whether or not further
substituted at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl,
cyanoalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-
piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-
pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3-morpholinyl)methyl, (tetrahydropyran-
4-yl)methyl, benzyl, or halobenzyl group whether or not further substituted
on the indole ring to any extent.
Some trade and other names: JWH-018 adamantyl carboxamide; STS-135;
MN-18; 5-Fluoro-MN-18, 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-N-(2-phenylpropan-2-yl)-1H-
pyrrolo[2,3-b]pyridine-3-carboxamide (5F-CUMYL-P7AICA) ; N-
(Adamantan-1-yl)-1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide (5F-
APINACA); methyl (2R)-2-[[1-(5-fluoropentyl)indazole-3-carbonyl]amino]-
3,3-dimethylbutanoate (5F-ADB); N-(1-amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-
1-(cyclohexylmethyl)indazole-3-carboxamide (AB-CHMINACA); 1-(4-
cyanobutyl)-N-(2-phenylpropan-2-yl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide (4-CN-
HB1099 ENROLLED

26.293.20 9 1099
CUMYL-BUTINACA); N-(1-amino-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-
(cyclohexylmethyl)indazole-3-carboxamide (ADB-CHMINACA or MAB-
CHMINACA); methyl (2S)-2-[[1-[4-fluorophenyl)methyl]indazole-3-
carbonyl]amino]-3,3-dimethylbutanoate (MDMB-FUBINACA); methyl 2-(1-
(cyclohexylmethyl)-1H-indole-3-carboxamido)-3-methylbutanoate (MMB-
CHMICA); methyl (2S)-2-[[1-[4-fluorophenyl)methyl]indazole-3-
carbonyl]amino]-3-methylbutanoate (AMB-FUBINACA); Methyl 2-(1-(5-
fluoropentyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamido)-3-methylbutanoate (5F-AMB);
methyl 2-(1-(5-fluoropentyl-1Hindole-3-carboxamido)-3,3-
dimethylbutaoate (5F-MDMB-PICA); methyl (S)-3,3-dimethyl-2-[(1-(pent-
4-enlindazole-3-carbonyl)amino]butanoate (MDMB-4en-PINACA); methyl
2-(1-(4-fluorobutyl)-1H-indazole-3carboxamido)-3,3-dimethylbutanoate
(4F-MDMB-BUTINACA); Ethyl 2-(1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indazole-3-
carboxamido)-3,3-dimethylbutanoate (5F-EDMB-PINACA); Methyl 2-(1-(5-
fluoropentyl)-1H-indole-3-carboxamido)-3,3-dimethylbutanoate S(5F-
MDMB-PICA); N-(adamantan-1-yl)-1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1H-indazole-3-
carboxamide (FUB-APINACA); 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-N-(2-phenylpropan-2-yl)-
1H-indazole-3-carboxamide (5F-CUMYL-PINACA); and
(l) Substituted Carboxylic Acid Indole. Any compound containing a 1H-indole-2-
carboxylic acid or 1H-indole-3-carboxylic acid substituted at the hydroxyl
group of the carboxylic acid with a phenyl, benzyl, naphthyl, adamantyl,
cyclopropyl, quinolinyl, isquinolinyl, cumyl, or propionaldehyde substituent
whether or not further substituted on the phenyl, benzyl, naphthyl,
adamantyl, cyclopropyl, cumyl, quinolinyl, isquinolinyl, or propionaldehyde
substituent to any extent and whether or not further substituted at the
nitrogen atom of the indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, cyanoalkyl, alkenyl,
cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-
morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3-
morpholinyl)methyl, tetrahydropyranylmethyl, benzyl, or halo benzyl group
whether or not further substituted on the indole ring to any extent.
Some trade and other names: Naphthalen-1-yl 1-(5-fluoropntyl)-1H-indole-
3-carboxylate (NM2201);
(48) 6,7-dihydro-5H-indeno-(5,6-d)-1,3-dioxol-6-amine) (MDAI);
(49) 2-(2,5-Dimethoxy-4-ethylphenyl)ethanamine (2C-E);
(50) 2-(2,5-Dimethoxy-4-methylphenyl)ethanamine (2C-D);
HB1099 ENROLLED

26.293.20 10 1099
(51) 2-(4-Chloro-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)ethanamine (2C-C);
(52) 2-(4-Iodo-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)ethanamine (2C-I);
(53) 2-[4-(Ethylthio)-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl]ethanamine (2C-T-2);
(54) 2-[4-(Isopropylthio)-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl]ethanamine (2C-T-4);
(55) 2-(2,5-Dimethoxyphenyl)ethanamine (2C-H);
(56) 2-(2,5-Dimethoxy-4-nitro-phenyl)ethanamine (2C-N);
(57) 2-(2,5-Dimethoxy-4-(n)-propylphenyl)ethanamine (2C-P);
(58) Substituted phenethylamine. Any compound, unless specifically exempt, listed as a
controlled substance in another schedule or an approved FDA drug, structurally
derived from phenylethan-2-amine by substitution on the phenyl ring in any of the
following ways: by substitution with a fused methylenedioxy, fused furan, or fused
tetrahydrofuran ring system; by substitution with two alkoxy groups; by
substitution with one alkoxy and either one fused furan, tetrahydrofuran, or
tetrahydropyran ring system; by substitution with two fused ring systems from any
combination of the furan, tetrahydrofuran, or tetrahydropyran ring systems;
whether or not the compound is further modified in any of the following ways:
(a) By substitution on the phenyl ring by any halo, hydroxyl, alkyl,
trifluoromethyl, alkoxy, or alkylthio groups;
(b) By substitution on the 2-position by any alkyl groups; or
(c) By substitution on the 2-amino nitrogen atom with acetyl, alkyl, dialkyl,
benzyl, methoxybenzyl, or hydroxybenzyl groups.
Some trade and other names: 2-(2,5-dimethoxy-4-
(methylthio)phenyl)ethanamine (2C-T or 4-methylthio-2,5-
dimethoxyphenethylamine); 1-(2,5-dimethoxy-4-iodophenyl)-propan-2-amine
(DOI or 2, 5-Dimethoxy-4-iodoamphetamine); 1-(4-Bromo-2,5-
dimethoxyphenyl)-2-aminopropane (DOB or 2,5-Dimethoxy-4-
bromoamphetamine); 1-(4-chloro-2,5-dimethoxy-phenyl)propan-2-amine (DOC
or 2,5-Dimethoxy-4-chloroamphetamine); 2-(4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)-N-
[(2-methoxyphenyl)methyl]ethanamine (2C-B-NBOMe; 25B-NBOMe or 2,5-
Dimethoxy-4-bromo-N-(2-methoxybenzyl)phenethylamine); 2-4-iodo-2,5-
dimethoxyphenyl)-N-[(2-methoxyphenyl)methyl]ethanamine (2C-I-NBOMe; 25I-
NBOMe or 2,5-Dimethoxy-4-iodo-N-(2-methoxybenzyl)phenethylamine); N-(2-
Methoxybenzyl)-2-(3,4,5-trimethoxypheny (Mescaline-NBOMe or 3,4,5-
trimethoxy-(2-methoxybenzyl)phenethylamine); 2-(4-chloro-2,5-
dimethoxyphenyl)-N-[(2-methoxyphenyl)methyl]ethanamine (2C-C-NBOMe; 25C-
HB1099 ENROLLED

26.293.20 11 1099
NBOMe or 2,5-Dimethoxy-4-chloro-N-(2-methoxybenzyl)phenethylamine); 2-(7-
Bromo-5-methoxy-2,3-dihydro-1-benzofuran-4-yl)ethanamine (2CB-5-hemiFLY);
2-(8-bromo-2,3,6,7-tetrahydrofuro [2,3-f][1]benzofuran-4-yl)ethanamine (2C-B-
FLY); 2-(10-Bromo-2,3,4,7,8,9-hexahydropyrano[2,3-g]chromen-5-
yl)ethanamine (2C-B-butterFLY); -(2-Methoxybenzyl)-1-(8-bromo-2,3,6,7-
tetrahydrobenzo[1,2-b:4,5-bΝ]difuran-4-yl)-2-aminoethane (2C-B-FLY-NBOMe);
1-(4-Bromofuro[2,3-f][1]benzofuran-8-yl)propan-2-amine (bromo-
benzodifuranyl-isopropylamine or bromo-dragonFLY); -(2-Hydroxybenzyl)-4-iodo-
2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine (2C-I-NBOH or 25I-NBOH); 5-(2-
Aminoprpyl)benzofuran (5-APB); 6(2-Aminopropyl)benzofuran (6-APB); 5-(2-
Aminopropyl)-2,3-dihydrobenzofuran (5-APDB); 6-(2-Aminopropyl)-2,3,-
dihydrobenzofuran (6-APDB); para-methoxymethamphetamine (PMMA);
(59) Substituted tryptamines. Any compound, unless specifically exempt, listed as a
controlled substance in another schedule or an approved FDA drug, structurally
derived from 2-(1H-indol-3-yl)ethanamine by mono- or di-substitution of the
amine nitrogen with alkyl or alkenyl groups or by inclusion of the amino nitrogen
atom in a cyclic structure whether or not the compound is further substituted at
the alpha-position with an alkyl group or whether or not further substituted on the
indole ring to any extent with any alkyl, alkoxy, halo, hydroxyl, or acetoxy groups.
Some trade and other names: 5-methoxy-N,N-diallyltryptamine (5-MeO-DALT); 4-
acetoxy-N,N-dimethyltryptamine (4-AcO-DMT or O-Acetylpsilocin); 4-hydroxy-N-
methyl-N-ethyltryptamine (4-HO-MET); 4-hydroxy-N,N-diisopropyltryptamine (4-
HO-DIPT); 5-methoxy-N-methyl-N-isopropyltryptamine (5-MeO-MiPT);
(60) Naphthalen-1-yl-(4-pentyloxynaphthalen-1-yl)methanone (CB-13);
(61) N-Adamantyl-1-pentyl-1H-Indazole-3-carboxamide (AKB 48);
(62) 1-(4-Fluorophenyl)piperazine (pFPP);
(63) 1-(3-Chlorophenyl)piperazine (mCPP);
(64) 1-(4-Methoxyphenyl)piperazine (pMeOPP);
(65) 1,4-Dibenzylpiperazine (DBP);
(66) Isopentedrone;
(67) Fluoromethamphetamine;
(68) Fluoroamphetamine;
(69) Fluorococaine;
(70) 1-pentyl-8-quinolinyl ester-1H-indole-3-carboxylic acid (PB-22);
(71) 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-8-quinolinyl ester-1H-indole-3-carboxylic acid (5 Fluoro-PB-22);
HB1099 ENROLLED

26.293.20 12 1099
(72) N-(1-amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-pentyl-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide (AB-
PINACA);
(73) N-(1-amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indazole-3-
carboxamide (5 Fluoro-AB-PINACA);
(74) N-(1-amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1H-indazole-3-
carboxamide (AB-FUBINACA);
(75) N-(1-amino-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-pentyl-1H-indole-3-carboxamide
(ADB-PINACA (ADBICA));
(76) N-(1-amino-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indole-3-
carboxamide (5 Fluoro-ADB-PINACA (5 Fluoro-ADBICA));
(77) N-(1-Amino-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1H-indazole-3-
carboxamide (ADB-FUBINACA);
(78) N-(1-carbamoyl-2-methyl-propyl)-2-(5-fluoropentyl)-5-(4-fluorophenyl)pyrazole-
3-carboxamide (5-Fluoro-3,5-AB-PFUPPYCA); and
(79) 2-(ethylamino)-2-(3-methoxyphenyl)cyclohexan-1-one (methoxetamine).
Section 2. That § 34-20B-25 be AMENDED:
34-20B-25. The following are included in Schedule IV:
(1) Chlordiazepoxide, but not including librax (chlordiazepoxide hydrochloride and
clindinium bromide) or menrium (chlordiazepoxide and water soluble esterified
estrogens);
(2) Clonazepam;
(3) Clorazepate;
(4) Diazepam;
(5) Flunitrazepam;
(6) Flurazepam;
(7) Mebutamate;
(8) Oxazepam;
(9) Prazepam;
(10) Lorazepam;
(11) Triazolam;
(12) Any substance that contains any quantity of a benzodiazepine, or salt of
benzodiazepine, except substances that are specifically listed in other schedules;
(13) Alprazolam;
(14) Midazolam;
HB1099 ENROLLED

26.293.20 13 1099
(15) Temazepam;
(16) Cathine;
(17) Fencamfamine;
(18) Fenproporex;
(19) Mefenorex;
(20) Pyrovalerone;
(21) Propoxyphene;
(22) Pentazocine;
(23) Diethylpropion;
(24) Ethchlorvynol;
(25) Ethinamate;
(26) Mazindol;
(27) Mephobarbital;
(28) Methohexitol;
(29) Paraldehyde;
(30) Pemoline;
(31) Petrichloral;
(32) Phentermine;
(33) Barbital;
(34) Phenobarbital;
(35) Meprobamate;
(36) Zolpidem;
(37) Butorphanol;
(38) Modafinil, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers;
(39) Sibutramine;
(40) Zaleplon;
(41) Dichloralphenazone;
(42) Zopiclone, also known as eszopiclone, including its salts, isomers, and salts of
isomers;
(43) Pregabalin;
(44) Lacosamide;
(45) Fospropofol, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers;
(46) Clobazam;
(47) Carisoprodol, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers;
HB1099 ENROLLED

26.293.20 14 1099
(48) Ezogabine,[-[2-amino-4-(4-fluorobenzylamino)-phenyl]-carbamic acid ethyl ester],
including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers;
(49) Lorcaserin, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation that contains any
quantity of the following substances, including its salts, isomers, and salts of
isomers, whenever the existence of such salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is
possible;
(50) Alfaxalone, 5[alpha]-pregnan-3[alpha]-ol-11,20-dione, including its salts, isomers,
and salts of isomers;
(51) Tramadol, 2-[(dimethylamino)methyl]-1-(3-methoxyphenyl)cyclohexanol, its salts,
optical and geometric isomers and salts of these isomers;
(52) Suvorexant, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers;
(53) Eluxadoline,(5-[[[(2S)-2-amino-3-[4-aminocarbonyl)-2,6-dimethylphenyl]-1-
oxopropyl][(1S)-1-(4-phenyl-1H-imidazol-2-yl)ethyl]amino]methyl]-2-
methoxybenzoic acid) including its optical isomers and its salts, isomers, and salts
of isomers;
(54) Brivaracetam;
(55) Solriamfetol (2-amino-3-phenylpropyl carbamate; benzenepropanol, beta-amino-,
carbamate (ester)), including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers whenever the
existence of the salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible;
(56) Brexanolone, (3[alpha]-hydroxy-5[alpha]-pregnan-20-one), including its salts,
isomers, and salts of isomers whenever the existence of the salts, isomers, and
salts of isomers is possible;
(57) Cenobamate ([(1R)-1-(2-chlorophenyl)-2-(tetrazol-2-yl)ethyl] carbamate; 2H-
tetrazole-2-ethanol, alpha-(2-chlorophenyl)-, carbamate (ester), (alphaR)-;
carbamic acid (R)-(+)-1-(2-chlorophenyl)-2-(2H-tetrazol-2-yl)ethyl ester);
(58) Lasmiditan [2,4,6-trifluoro-N-(6-(1-methylpiperidine-4-carbonyl)pyridine-2-yl)-
benzamide];
(59) Lemborexant, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers;
(60) Remimazolam;
(61) Serdexmethylphenidate, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers;
(62) Daridorexant, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers;
(63) Ganaxolone, including its salts;
(64) Zuranolone; and
(65) The pharmaceutical composition of crystalline polymorph psilocybin in a drug
product approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration.
HB1099 ENROLLED

26.293.20 15 1099
An Act to reschedule the pharmaceutical composition of crystalline polymorph psilocybin in a
drug product approved by the Food and Drug Administration as a Schedule IV controlled
substance.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1099
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1099 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1099 ENROLLED